Maryland, session 2026, HB0647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Power Plant Research Program shall study and make recommendations
on nuclear energy and its role as a renewable energy resource that can effectively combat
climate change in the State.
(b) The study shall:
(1) evaluate and summarize the current state of nuclear energy in
Maryland;
(2) identify the benefits of nuclear energy use in Maryland, including the
environmental benefits of nuclear energy that may help to combat climate change;
(3) identify the potential for a new nuclear power initiative to be deployed
within the State using one or more nuclear technologies, including identifying:
(i) major barriers to deploying a successful nuclear power initiative;
and
(ii) a time frame for deploying a successful nuclear power initiative;
(4) identify potential locations in the State where State–owned and
operated nuclear energy generating stations may be constructed;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0647*

HOUSE BILL 647
(5) assess the practicality of adding nuclear energy to Maryland’s
Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard; and
(6) include recommendations regarding initiatives for the State and the
General Assembly to responsibly and efficiently grow the nuclear energy industry in the
State, support new emerging nuclear energy technologies that may improve nuclear energy
as a viable renewable energy resource, and utilize nuclear energy as a resource to help the
State combat climate change.
(c) On or before September 30, 2027, the Power Plant Research Program shall
report its official findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.